es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Componentes para computadoras > Piezas de repuesto para tablets: Botones y cables flexibles de computadora tableta; Módulos de cámara de computadora tableta; Conectores y puertos de carga de computadora tableta; Embellecedores y carcasas para tablets; Placas base y tarjetas lógicas de computadora tableta; Altavoces de repuesto para tablets; Digitalizadores de pantalla y pantallas para tablets
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Linh kiện máy tính > Linh kiện máy tính bảng: Nút và cáp linh hoạt máy tính bảng; Mô-đun máy ảnh máy tính bảng; Đầu nối và cổng sạc máy tính bảng; Vỏ bảo vệ và trang trí máy tính bảng; Bảng mạch chủ và bảng logic máy tính bảng; Loa thay thế máy tính bảng; Màn hình máy tính bảng & Bộ số hóa màn hình
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > ส่วนประกอบคอมพิวเตอร์ > ชิ้นส่วนคอมพิวเตอร์แท็บเล็ต: ปุ่มและสายแฟล็กซ์แท็บเล็ต; โมดูลกล้องแท็บเล็ต; ตัวเชื่อมต่อและพอร์ตชาร์จแท็บเล็ต; เฟรมสำหรับคอมพิวเตอร์แท็บเล็ต; เมนบอร์ดและบอร์ดควบคุมแท็บเล็ต; ลำโพงอะไหล่ของคอมพิวเตอร์แท็บเล็ต; ตัวแปลงหน้าจอเป็นดิจิทัลและหน้าจอคอมพิวเตอร์แท็บเล็ต
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Componente calculatoare > Piese pentru tablete: Butoane și cabluri flex pentru tablete; Module de cameră pentru tablete; Conectori și porturi de încărcare pentru tablete; Carcase și ornamente pentru tablete; Plăci de bază și plăci logice pentru tablete; Difuzoare de schimb pentru tablete; Ecrane pentru tablete și digitizoare pentru ecrane
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > 電腦元件 > 平板電腦零件: 平板電腦按鈕與排線; 平板電腦相機模組; 平板電腦連接器與充電埠; 平板電腦包/支架/外殼; 平板電腦主機板與邏輯板; 平板電腦喇叭備品; 平板電腦螢幕/數位繪圖板
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Számítógép-komponensek > Táblagépalkatrészek: Táblagépgombok és flex-kábelek; Táblagépkamera-modulok; Táblagép-csatlakozók és -töltőportok; Táblagépházak és -burkolatok; Táblagépalaplapok és logikai lapok; Táblagép-cserehangszórók; Táblagépképernyők és -képernyő-digitalizálók
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Počítačové komponenty > Diely tabletového počítača: Tlačidlá a flexibilné káble tabletov; Kamerové moduly tabletov; Konektory a nabíjacie porty tabletov; Kryty a vybavenie tabletových počítačov; Základné dosky a logické dosky tabletov; Náhradné reproduktory pre tabletové počítače; Obrazovky a digitalizátory obrazoviek tabletových počítačov
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Computerkomponenten > Tablet-PC-Ersatzteile: Tablet-Computer-Tasten und -Flachbandkabel; Tablet-Computer-Kameramodule; Tablet-Computer-Anschlüsse und -Ladebuchsen; Tablet-Gehäuse & -Rahmen; Tablet-Computer-Hauptplatinen und -Logikplatinen; Tablet-Ersatzlautsprecher; Tablet-Bildschirme und Bildschirm-Digitizer
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 计算机组件 > 平板电脑部件: 平板电脑按钮和排线; 平板电脑摄像头模块; 平板电脑连接器和充电口; 平板电脑外壳; 平板电脑主板和逻辑板; 平板电脑替换用扬声器; 平板电脑屏幕/触控感应层
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Εξαρτήματα υπολογιστή > Ανταλλακτικά tablet: Κουμπιά και καλώδια flex για tablet; Μονάδες κάμερας για tablet; Σύνδεσμοι και θύρες φόρτισης για tablet; Περιβλήματα και διακοσμητικά στοιχεία για tablet; Μητρικές και λογικές πλακέτες για tablet; Ανταλλακτικά ηχεία tablet; Οθόνες & ψηφιοποιητές Tablet
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 컴퓨터 구성품 > 태블릿 컴퓨터 부품: 태블릿 컴퓨터 버튼 및 플렉스 케이블; 태블릿 컴퓨터 카메라 모듈; 태블릿 컴퓨터 커넥터 및 충전 포트; 태블릿 컴퓨터 하우징/트림; 태블릿 컴퓨터 메인보드 및 로직 보드; 태블릿 컴퓨터 교체 스피커; 태블릿 컴퓨터 액정/액정 디지타이저
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Kompiuterių komponentai > Planšetinių kompiuterių dalys: Planšetinių kompiuterių mygtukai ir lankstieji kabeliai; Planšetinių kompiuterių kamerų moduliai; Planšetinių kompiuterių jungtys ir įkrovimo lizdai; Planšetinių kompiuterių korpusai ir apdaila; Planšetinių kompiuterių pagrindinės ir logikos plokštės; Planšetinių kompiuterių atsarginiai garsiakalbiai; Planšetinių kompiuterių ekranai ir ekranų skaitmeninimo įrenginiai
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Datorkomponenter > Reservdelar till surfplattor: Surfplattknappar och flexkablar; Kameramoduler för surfplattor; Surfplattkontakter och laddningsportar; Chassin och komponenter för surfplattor; Moderkort och logikkort för surfplattor; Ersättningshögtalare till surfplattor; Skärmar och digitizer för surfplattor
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > Tietokonekomponentit > Tablettitietokoneen osat: Tablet-tietokoneen painikkeet ja virtajohdot; Tablet-tietokoneen kameramoduuli; Tablet-tietokoneen liittimet ja latausportit; Tablettitietokoneen kotelointi ja viimeistely; Tablet-tietokoneen emolevy ja logiikkalevy; Tablettitietokoneen vaihtokaiuttimet; Tablettitietokoneen näytöt ja näyttösuojat
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Datamaskinkomponenter > Deler til nettbrett: Knapper og flekskabler til nettbrett; Kameramoduler til nettbrett; Kontakter og ladeporter til nettbrett; Kabinetter og eksterne deler til nettbrett; Hovedkort og logikkort til nettbrett; Erstatningshøyttalere til nettbrett; Skjermer og skjermdigitalisatorer for nettbrett
hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Računalne komponente > Dijelovi tablet računala: Gumbovi i flex kabeli za tablet; Moduli kamere za tablet; Konektori i priključci za punjenje tableta; Kućišta i rubovi za tablet računala; Matične i logičke ploče za tablet; Zamjenski zvučnici za tablet računala; Zasloni tablet računala i digitalizatori zaslona
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Componenti per computer > Ricambi per tablet: Pulsanti e cavi flex del computer tablet; Moduli fotocamera del computer tablet; Connettori e porte di ricarica del computer tablet; Custodie e rivestimenti per tablet; Schede madri e schede logiche del computer tablet; Altoparlanti sostituitivi per tablet; Schermi e digitalizzatori per tablet
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Composants d’ordinateur > Pièces pour tablettes PC: Boutons et câbles plats flexibles pour tablette; Modules caméra pour tablette; Connecteurs et ports de charge pour tablette; Cadres et éléments de boîtier pour tablettes PC; Cartes mères et cartes logiques pour tablette; Haut-parleurs de rechange pour tablette PC; Écrans et numériseurs pour tablettes
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Elementy komputera > Części do tabletów: Przyciski i taśmy flex do tabletów; Moduły kamer do tabletów; Złącza i porty ładowania do tabletów; Obudowy tabletów; Płyty główne i płyty logiczne do tabletów; Zapasowe głośniki do tabletów; Monitory i digitizery do tabletów
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Computer Components > Tablet Computer Parts: Tablet Computer Buttons & Flex Cables; Tablet Computer Camera Modules; Tablet Computer Connectors & Charging Ports; Tablet Computer Housings & Trim; Tablet Computer Motherboards & Logic Boards; Tablet Computer Replacement Speakers; Tablet Computer Screens & Screen Digitizers
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Računalniške komponente > Deli za tablične računalnike: Gumbi in fleksibilni kabli za tablične računalnike; Kamerski moduli za tablične računalnike; Konektorji in polnilne vrata za tablične računalnike; Ohišja in okvirji za tablične računalnike; Matične plošče za tablične računalnike; Nadomestni zvočniki za tablične računalnike; Zasloni in digitalizatorji zaslonov za tablične računalnike
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Componentes para computador > Peças para tablets: Botões e cabos flex para tablet; Módulos de câmera para tablet; Conectores e portas de carregamento para tablet; Equipamentos e carcaças para computadores tablets; Placas-mãe e logic boards para tablet; Alto-falantes de reposição para tablet; Telas e digitalizadores de telas para tablet
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Componentes informáticos > Peças de tablet: Botões e cabos flexíveis para tablet; Módulos de câmara para tablet; Conectores e portas de carregamento para tablet; Caixas e acabamentos para tablet; Placas-mãe e placas lógicas para tablet; Colunas de substituição de tablet; Ecrãs de digitadores e ecrãs de tablet
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > PC部品・周辺機器 > タブレットPC用パーツ: タブレットコンピューターボタン・フレックスケーブル; タブレットコンピューターカメラモジュール; タブレットコンピューターコネクター・充電ポート; タブレット PCケース・カバー; タブレットコンピューターマザーボード・ロジックボード; タブレットPC用スピーカー; タブレット PC 用スクリーン/スクリーン デジタイザー
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > Počítačové komponenty > Díly pro tablety: Tlačítka a flexibilní kabely pro tablety; Kamerové moduly pro tablety; Konektory a nabíjecí porty pro tablety; Náhradní kryty a rámečky pro tablety; Základní desky a logické desky pro tablety; Náhradní reproduktory pro tablety; Displeje a digitalizátory tabletů
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Computeronderdelen > Onderdelen voor tablets: Tablet knoppen en flexkabels; Tablet camera modules; Tablet connectoren en oplaadpoorten; Behuizingen en shells voor tablets; Tablet moederborden en logic boards; Vervangende luidsprekers voor tablets; Schermen en schermdigitizers voor tabletcomputers
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Компютърни компоненти > Части за таблетен компютър: Бутони и гъвкави кабели за таблет; Модули за камера на таблет; Конектори и портове за зареждане за таблет; Корпуси и лайсни за таблетни компютри; Системни платки за таблет; Резервни говорители за таблетен компютър; Екрани за таблетни компютри и дигитайзери на екрани
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Computerkomponenter > Reservedele til tablets: Tablet-computer – knapper og flexkabler; Tablet-computer – kameramoduler; Tablet-computer – stik og opladningsporte; Kabinetter til tablets; Tablet-computer – bundkort og logic boards; Integrerbare højttalere til tablets; Skærme og digitizere til tablets
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Bilgisayar Bileşenleri > Tablet Bilgisayar Parçaları: Tablet Bilgisayar Düğmeleri ve Esnek Kabloları; Tablet Bilgisayar Kamera Modülleri; Tablet Bilgisayar Konektörleri ve Şarj Portları; Tablet Bilgisayar Kasaları ve Çerçeveleri; Tablet Bilgisayar Anakartları ve Mantık Kartları; Tablet Bilgisayar Yedek Hoparlörleri; Tablet Bilgisayar Ekranları ve Ekranı
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Компьютерные компоненты > Запчасти для планшетов: Кнопки и шлейфы для планшетных компьютеров; Модули камер для планшетных компьютеров; Разъемы и порты зарядки для планшетных компьютеров; Корпусы и рамки для планшетов; Материнские платы и логические платы планшетных компьютеров; Динамики для планшетов; Экраны и дигитайзеры для планшетов